New Jersey, session 222, S535.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     The Secretary of Higher Education shall, upon application, award a one-time grant in the amount of $100,000 to a four-year public institution of higher education for the purposes of studying and recommending best practices for encouraging youth interest and participation in government. b.    An institution of higher education that wishes to apply for the grant established under subsection a. of this act shall submit an application to the Secretary of Higher Education, in a manner determined by the secretary.  The application shall include, along with any other information the secretary deems appropriate, a grant proposal detailing the study objectives and a projected budget outlining how the institution intends to use the grant funds. c.     The institution of higher education that is awarded the grant shall issue a report to the Secretary of Higher Education, the Commissioner of Education, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) no later than one year following the receipt of the grant. The report shall: (1)   identify best practices that exist to encourage youth participation in government; and (2)   provide recommendations as to which practices are most effective in promoting and increasing youth participation in government. d.    The Commissioner of Education shall post the report issued pursuant to subsection c. of this section on the Department of Educations Internet website and shall distribute a copy of the report to each school district in the State within 60 days following the commissioners receipt of the report. e.     The Secretary of Higher Education shall adopt, in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.